src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Skolt Saami verb morphology

!! First a lexicon V_ for still unclassified entries.

LEXICON V_
+Inf: # ;

LEXICON V-NEG_
+Neg: # ;

!! ## Irregular verbs

!! Then irregular verbs ij and the copula.

LEXICON V-NEG_IJ  !!= * @CODE@ ij:
!! The lexicon *@LEXNAME@*

+Neg+Ind+Sg1:jiõˈm	   K ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Sg1:jim	   K ; !!= * @CODE@
+Neg+Ind+Sg2:jiõˈk	   K ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Sg2:jik	   K ;
+Neg+Ind+Sg3:ij		   K ;
+Neg+Ind+Sg4:jeäˈt	   K ;
+Neg+Ind+Sg4+Err/Orth-extra-q:jeäˈʹt	   K ; ! T.Tynnøl 2025-02-10: This is an incorrect form according to Miika Lehtinen. Sammalahti wrote this word with the grade mark to signal a short diphthong, which some people have interpreted as a soft sign.
+Neg+Ind+Pl1:jeäˈʹp	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Pl1:jeʹp	   K ;
+Neg+Ind+Pl2:jeäˈʹped   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Pl2:jeʹped	   K ;
+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jiâ	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jeä	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jie	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jee	   K ;

+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:jieˈʹl	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:jeäˈʹl	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:jeˈʹl	   K ;
+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:jieʹlˈled  K ;	
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:jeʹlˈled   K ;	
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:jeäʹled   K ;	

+Neg+Pot+Sg2:jieˈʹl	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Pot+Sg2:jeˈʹl	   K ;
+Neg+Pot+Sg3:jeälas	   K ;
+Neg+Pot+Pl1:jeälˈlap   K ;
+Neg+Pot+Pl2:jieʹlˈled  K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Neg+Pot+Pl2:jeʹlˈled   K ;			
+Neg+Pot+Pl3:jeälˈlaz   K ;



LEXICON IV_LEEQD !!= * @CODE@ leeʹd:l
+IV: V0_LEEQD ;
LEXICON V0_LEEQD !!= * @CODE@ leeʹd:l
!! The lexicon *@LEXNAME@* for the copula

+Ind+Prs:		LEED-PRS ;
+Ind+Prt:		LEED-PRT ;
+Imprt:			LEED-IMPRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:eäkˈku	K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:%>eäkˈku K ;
:%>eʹč^Br		CONDITIONAL ; !This needs the extra ^Br to prevent leʹčʼčem20240429
+Pot+Sg1:%>eʹžžem K	;
+Pot+Sg1+Use/NG:%>eʹǯǯem K	; ! Koltansaamen Kielioppi (KK) p. 99
+Pot+Sg2:%>eʹžžiǩ K	;
+Pot+Sg2+Err/Orth-extra-q:%>eʹžžiʹǩ K	;
+Pot+Sg2+Use/NG:%>eʹǯǯiǩ K	; ! KK p. 99
+Pot+Sg2+Err/Orth-extra-q:%>eʹǯǯiʹǩ K	;
+Pot+Sg3:%>eežž	K ; !WG
+Pot+Sg3:%>eež	K ; !
+Pot+Sg3+Use/NG:%>eeǯǯ	K ; ! KK p. 99
+Pot+Pl1:%>eʹžžep K	; !
+Pot+Pl1:%>eʹžžim K	; !
+Pot+Pl1+Use/NG:%>eʹǯǯep K	; ! KK p. 99
+Pot+Pl1+Use/NG:%>eʹǯǯim K	; ! KK p. 99
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Pot+Pl1:%>eʹžžin K	; !Does this exist
+Pot+Pl2:%>eʹžžveʹted K	;
+Pot+Pl2:%>eʹžžid K	;
+Pot+Pl2+Use/NG:%>eʹǯǯveʹted K	; ! KK p. 99
+Pot+Pl2+Use/NG:%>eʹǯǯid K	; ! KK p. 99
+Pot+Pl3:%>eʹžže K	;
+Pot+Pl3+Use/NG:%>eʹǯǯe K	; ! KK p. 99
+Pot+Sg4:%>eʹžžet K ;
+Pot+Sg4+Use/NG:%>eʹǯǯet K ; ! KK p. 99
+Pot+ConNeg:%>eʹžže K ;
+Pot+ConNeg+Use/NG:%>eʹǯǯe K ; ! KK p. 99
+Inf:%>eeʹd K ;
+Act+PrsPrc:%>eʹddi K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>eämˈmaž K ;
+Err/Orth+Act+PrfPrc:%>eäʹmmaž K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>eämˈma K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>eäm K ;

LEXICON NEG-COPULA
+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹlla K ; !ei ole
+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹllak K ; !ei ole
+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹlle K ; !ei ole
+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹllä K ; !ei ole
+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹllakku K ; !ei ole
+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹlleäk K ; !ei ole
+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹlleäkˈku K ; !ei ole
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:iʹlleäm K ; !ei ollut
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:iʹllääm K ; !ei ollut
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:iʹlleämˈma K ; !ei ollut
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:iʹlleämmaž K ; !ei ollut

+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:jeäʹla K ; !eivät ole
+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:jiâla K ; !eivät ole
+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:jielä K ; !eivät ole
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹleäm K ; !eivät olleet
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹleämma K ; !eivät olleet
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹläm K ; !eivät olleet
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹlam K ; !eivät olleet Tiina SA 2024-02-10
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹlämma K ; !eivät olleet
+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹlämmaž K ; !eivät olleet

+Neg+Cond+Sg3:iʹlleʹjje K ; !ei olisi
+Neg+Cond+Sg3:iʹlleʹčče K ; !ei olisi
+Neg+Pot+Sg3:iʹlleʹžže K ; !ei olisi


!! ## REGULAR VERBS
!! ### CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION

LEXICON V_1Â_VVCC !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
: V0_POOLLYD ;
LEXICON V_POOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
: V0_POOLLYD ;
LEXICON IV_POOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
+IV: V0_POOLLYD ;
LEXICON TV_POOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
+TV: V0_POOLLYD ;
LEXICON V0_POOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
!!! inflection_type="1"
!!! V2C2_ÂD
!!! pos="V"
!!! syll_count-in-Ind_Prs_Sg3="1"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Inf="â"
!!! gradation_type="normal"
!!! Inf="short_vowel" Imprt_Sg3="long_vowel|single_consonant"

! foot: 2syll
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: yes
! consonant_type: geminate-single
! gradation: yes3
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: geminate

!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! palatal_coloring: no (^PALÄ, ^PALE, ^PALẸ)
! palatalization: yes (^PAL, ^PALNo)
! velar_palatalization: FIX no (pååttaǩ)
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! pedagogical_gradation: no
! orthographic_gradation: yes
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[231] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3  = põõllâd
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: põõllâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: pââll
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: pâʹlle
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: põʹlle
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: põõl
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: põõlâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: pââlas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: põll
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: pâllaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: põl
! * Yaml: __V-moonnad__
! põõllâd:põõll
! Strong grade in penultimate syllable
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1 põõllâd
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NMN_PRSPRCÂ_VVCC-I ; !NOM-AG_ÂD ; ! 20251010
!:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:^VOWLower K ; ! pââll
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL%>e K ; !3 pâʹlle
:^VV2V^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ; !4 põʹlle
:^CC2C VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5 põõl-
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5 põõll-/raajj- too strong, should be one weaker in grade.
+Pot+Sg3:^CC2C%>âž   K ; !6 põõl-
+Imprt+Sg3:^VOWLower^CC2C%>as K ; !7 pââlas
:^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8 põll-
+Imprt+ConNegII:^VV2V%>u K ; ! põllu
+Imprt+Pl3:^VV2V^VOWLower%>az K ; ! pâllaz

:^VV2V^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: poorrâd #
!!€ poorrâd:	    poorrâd+V+Inf
!!€ pooram:	    poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ poorak:	    poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2
!!€ påårr:          poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ poorrâp:        poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1
!!€ poorrveʹted:    poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2
!!€ påʹrre:         poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
!!€ poorât:         poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4
!!€ poʹrrem:   	    poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ poʹrriǩ:  	    poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
!!€ poori:          poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3
!!€ poorim:	    poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ poorid:    	    poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2
!!€ poʹrre:         poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3
!!€ poʹrreš:        poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4
!!€ pooržem:        poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg1
!!€ pooržiǩ:        poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg2
!!€ poorâž:         poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg3
!!€ pooržep:	    poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl1
!!€ pooržid:        poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl2
!!€ poorže:         poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl3
!!€ pooržet:        poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg4
!!€ poorže:         poorrâd+V+Pot+ConNeg
!!€ poorčem:        poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg1
!!€ poorčiǩ:        poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg2
!!€ poorči:         poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg3
!!€ poorčim:	    poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl1
!!€ poorčid:        poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl2
!!€ poorče:         poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl3
!!€ poorčeš:        poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg4
!!€ poorče:         poorrâd+V+Cond+ConNeg
!!€ poor:           poorrâd+V+Imprt+Sg2
!!€ pååras:         poorrâd+V+Imprt+Sg3
!!€ poorrâp:        poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl1
!!€ poorrâd:        poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl2
!!€ pårraz:         poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl3
!!€ porru:          poorrâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII
!!€ poorrmen:       poorrâd+V+Actio+Ess
!!€ poorrâm:        poorrâd+V+Actio
!!€ poorri:         poorrâd+V+Act+PrsPrc
!!€ poorrâm:        poorrâd+V+Act+PrfPrc
!!€ porrum:         poorrâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc
!!€ poorkani:	    poorrâd+V+VAbess
!!€ pooreen:        poorrâd+V+Ger+Ess
!!€ pooreeʹl:       poorrâd+V+Ger+Instr
!!€ porškueʹtted:   poorrâd+V+Der+Der/InchL+V+Inf

LEXICON V_LAUKKOOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
: V0_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
LEXICON IV_LAUKKOOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
+IV: V0_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
LEXICON TV_LAUKKOOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
+TV: V0_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
LEXICON V0_LAUKKOOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
!!! inflection_type="1"
!!! V2C2_ÂD_3_syll
! pos: V
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! inf: âd
! foot: 2syll
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: yes
! consonant_type: geminate-single
! gradation: yes3
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: geminate

!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! palatal_coloring: no (^PALÄ, ^PALE, ^PALẸ)
! palatalization: yes (^PAL, ^PALNo)
! velar_palatalization: FIX no (pååttaǩ)
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! pedagogical_gradation: no
! orthographic_gradation: yes
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[231] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3  = laukkõõllâd
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: laukkõõllâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: pââll
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: pâʹlle
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: põʹlle
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: põõl
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: põõlâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: laukkõõlas
! (8)  Imprt.ConNegII: laukkõll
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: laukkâllaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: laukkõl
! * Yaml: __V-moonnad__
! laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
! Strong grade in penultimate syllable
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@1 laukkõõllâd
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NMN_PRSPRCÂ_VVCC-I ; !NOM-AG_ÂD ; ! 20251010
!:^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:^VOWLower K ; !!= * @CODE@ laukkââll
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@3 laukkâʹlle
:^VV2V^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@4 laukkõʹlle
:^CC2C VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@5 laukkõõl-
+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@5 ERR laukkõõll-
+Pot+Sg3:^CC2C%>âž   K ; !!= * @CODE@6 laukkõõl-
+Imprt+Sg3:^VOWLower^CC2C%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@7 laukkââlas 2024-06-11 was laukkõõlas ?Feist
:^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !!= * @CODE@8 laukkõll-
+Imprt+ConNegII:^VV2V%>u K ; !!= * @CODE@ laukkõllu
+Imprt+Pl3:^VV2V^VOWLower%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ laukkâllaz
:^VV2V^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

LEXICON V_1Â_VVKK !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
: V0_1Â_VVKK ;
LEXICON IV_1Â_VVKK !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
+IV: V0_1Â_VVKK ;
LEXICON TV_1Â_VVKK !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
+TV: V0_1Â_VVKK ;
